ro-RO: Dimensiunea cupei atletice: Adult extra large; Adult large; Adult medium; Adult small; Intermediar; Junior; Mărime universală; Peewee; Tineret; Altele
da: Atletisk skålstørrelse: Voksen, ekstra stor; Voksen, stor; Voksen, medium; Voksen, lille; Mellem; Junior; Onesize; Peewee; Ungdom; Andet
sk-SK: Veľkosť suspenzora: Dospelí extra veľké; Dospelí veľké; Dospelí stredné; Dospelí malé; Stredná kategória; Junior; Univerzálna veľkosť; Žiaci (Peewee); Mládež; Iné
lt-LT: Apsauginio kaušelio dydis: Suaugusiųjų ypač didelis; Suaugusiųjų didelis; Suaugusiųjų vidutinis; Suaugusiųjų mažas; Tarpinis; Jaunių; Vieno dydžio; Vaikų; Jaunimo; Kita
nb: Atletisk koppstørrelse: Voksen ekstra stor; Voksen stor; Voksen medium; Voksen liten; Mellomstørrelse; Junior; One size; Peewee; Ungdom; Annet
es: Talla de copa atlética: Adulto extragrande; Adulto grande; Adulto mediano; Adulto pequeño; Intermedio; Junior; Talla única; Peewee; Juvenil; Otra
nl: Sport cupmaat: Volwassenen extra groot; Volwassenen groot; Volwassenen medium; Volwassenen klein; Tussenmaat; Junior; One size; Peewee; Jeugd; Overige
ja: アスレチックカップサイズ: 大人用XL; 大人用L; 大人用M; 大人用S; インターメディエイト; ジュニア; ワンサイズ; ピーウィー; ユース; その他
ko: 운동용 보호컵 사이즈: 성인 엑스트라 라지; 성인 라지; 성인 미디엄; 성인 스몰; 인터미디엇; 주니어; 원사이즈; 피위; 유스; 기타
de: Größe der Suspensorien für Sportler: Erwachsene Extra-Groß; Erwachsene Groß; Erwachsene Mittel; Erwachsene Klein; Mittel; Junior; Einheitsgröße; Peewee; Jugendliche; Sonstige
pl: Rozmiar suspensora ochronnego: Dorośli (XL); Dorośli (L); Dorośli (M); Dorośli (S); Średni; Junior; Rozmiar uniwersalny; Dziecięcy (peewee); Młodzieżowy; Inne
tr: Atletik koruyucu kap boyutu: Yetişkin ekstra büyük; Yetişkin büyük; Yetişkin orta; Yetişkin küçük; Orta; Junior; Tek beden; Minik; Genç; Diğer
zh-TW: 運動護襠尺寸: 成人特大; 成人大; 成人中; 成人小; 中童; 青少年; 單一尺寸; 兒童; 青少童; 其他
fi: Urheilullinen kuppikoko: Aikuisten erittäin suuri; Aikuisten suuri; Aikuisten keskikokoinen; Aikuisten pieni; Välikoko; Junior; Yksi koko; Peewee; Nuorten; Muu
hu: Atlétikai kupaméret: Felnőtt extra nagy; Felnőtt nagy; Felnőtt közepes; Felnőtt kicsi; Közepes; Junior; Egyméretes; Peewee; Ifjúsági; Egyéb
ru: Размер защитного козырька: Взрослый XL; Взрослый L; Взрослый M; Взрослый S; Подростковый; Юниорский; Универсальный размер; Детский; Юношеский; Другое
pt-BR: Tamanho da coquilha esportiva: Adulto extragrande; Adulto grande; Adulto médio; Adulto pequeno; Intermediário; Júnior; Tamanho único; Infantil; Juvenil; Outro
vi: Kích thước cốc bảo vệ: Người lớn XL; Người lớn L; Người lớn M; Người lớn S; Trung bình; Trẻ em; Một kích cỡ; Trẻ nhỏ (Peewee); Thanh thiếu niên; Khác
th: ขนาดของกระจับนักกีฬา: ผู้ใหญ่ไซส์ใหญ่พิเศษ; ผู้ใหญ่ไซส์ใหญ่; ผู้ใหญ่ไซส์กลาง; ผู้ใหญ่ไซส์เล็ก; วัยรุ่นตอนต้น; เด็ก; ขนาดเดียว; เด็กเล็ก; เยาวชน; อื่นๆ
el: Μέγεθος αθλητικού προστατευτικού (σπασουάρ): Ενηλίκων extra large; Ενηλίκων large; Ενηλίκων medium; Ενηλίκων small; Ενδιάμεσο; Junior; Ένα μέγεθος / One size; Peewee; Εφηβικό; Άλλο
en: Athletic cup size: Adult extra large; Adult large; Adult medium; Adult small; Intermediate; Junior; One size; Peewee; Youth; Other
fr: Taille de la coquille de protection sportive: Adulte très grand; Adulte grand; Adulte moyen; Adulte petit; Intermédiaire; Junior; Taille unique; Peewee; Enfant; Autre
zh-CN: 运动护裆尺寸: 成人加大号; 成人大号; 成人中号; 成人小号; 中号; 青少年号; 均码; 儿童号; 青年号; 其他
hr-HR: Veličina štitnika za genitalije: Odrasli (iznimno veliko); Odrasli (veliko); Odrasli (srednje); Odrasli (malo); Srednje; Junior; Univerzalna veličina; Djeca (peewee); Mladi; Ostalo
bg-BG: Размер на защитната чашка: За възрастни (XL); За възрастни (L); За възрастни (M); За възрастни (S); Среден размер; За деца; Универсален размер; За най-малки; Младежки; Друго
sv: Atletisk kupstorlek: Vuxen extra large; Vuxen large; Vuxen medium; Vuxen small; Intermediate; Junior; One size; Knatte; Ungdom; Annat
sl-SI: Velikost ščitnika za mednožje: Odrasli, zelo velika; Odrasli, velika; Odrasli, srednja; Odrasli, majhna; Vmesna; Junior; Enotna velikost; Peewee; Mladinska; Drugo
it: Taglia della coppa atletica: Adulti extra large; Adulti large; Adulti medium; Adulti small; Intermedia; Junior; Taglia unica; Peewee; Ragazzi; Altro
cs: Velikost sportovního suspenzoru: Dospělí – extra velké (XL); Dospělí – velké (L); Dospělí – střední (M); Dospělí – malé (S); Střední (intermediate); Junioři; Univerzální velikost; Nejmenší (peewee); Mládež; Ostatní
pt-PT: Tamanho da coquilha para desporto<em><em></em></em>: Adulto extra grande; Adulto grande; Adulto médio; Adulto pequeno; Intermédio; Júnior; Tamanho único; Infantil; Jovem; Outros